Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III.] ENERGY EMERGENCY PLANNING

[§125C-31] Biennial state energy emergency
preparedness plan. (a) The department of business, economic development,
and tourism shall prepare a comprehensive and integrated biennial state energy
emergency preparedness plan to be implemented in the event of, or in
anticipation of, a change in the State's petroleum supply or demand situation
that is judged by the governor to be unmanageable by the free market. The
department of business, economic development, and tourism shall prepare a
biennial state energy emergency preparedness plan in every even-numbered year
in accordance with the following:

(1) The biennial state energy emergency preparedness
plan shall replace the energy emergency plan developed by the energy resources
coordinator, who shall act as the governor's authorized representative under
this chapter;

(2) In preparing the biennial state energy emergency
preparedness plan, the department shall:

(A) Solicit input, comment, and review from
the governor's energy emergency preparedness advisory committee composed of
representatives of federal, state, and county governments; private energy
suppliers; consumer and other public interest groups; and the public at-large;
and

(B) Establish other task forces and advisory
groups, as may be deemed necessary, to assist in the preparation and review of
the biennial state energy emergency preparedness plan;

(3) The biennial state energy emergency preparedness
plan shall be comprehensive and encompassing, and shall integrate into its
analytic and planning framework the plans of electric and gas utilities and
other energy suppliers, relevant state agencies, including the department of
transportation, counties, and such other entities as deemed appropriate; and

(4) The biennial state energy emergency preparedness
plan shall include a review and update of the previous biennial state energy
emergency preparedness plan and a review of the energy emergency plans prepared
by the counties.

(b) The department shall prepare an energy
emergency communication plan, which shall be updated biennially and shall be
consistent with the energy emergency preparedness plans prepared by the
counties. The energy emergency communication plan shall be used by the State
and counties to communicate and otherwise coordinate state and county actions
taken in response to implementing the biennial state energy emergency
preparedness plan. [L 1992, c 182, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next